Montana, session 2025, HB421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 76-13-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-13-201. Costs for protection from fire. (1) An owner of land classified as forest land that is
within a wildland fire protection district or that is otherwise under contract for fire protection by a recognized
agency is subject to the fees for fire protection provided in this section.
(2) The department shall provide fire protection to the land described in subsection (1) at a cost to
the landowner of not more than $50 $58.70 for each landowner in the protection district and of not more than an
additional 30 49 cents per acre per year for each acre in excess of 20 acres owned by each landowner in each
protection district, as necessary to yield the amount of money provided for in 76-13-207. Assessment, payment,
and collection of the fire protection costs must be in accordance with 76-13-207.
(3) Other charges may not be assessed to a participating landowner except in cases of proved
negligence on the part of the landowner or the landowner's agent or in the event of a violation of 50-63-103."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 421
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 421, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 421
INTRODUCED BY S. GIST
AN ACT INCREASING FIRE PROTECTION ASSESSMENT RATES COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
NATURAL RESOURCES AND CONSERVATION; AMENDING SECTION 76-13-201, MCA; AND PROVIDING
AN EFFECTIVE DATE.”